District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.04

Mandatory adequate waste collection.

(a)

A private collection property owner shall provide adequate waste collection service, including:

(1)

Supplying waste containers to make source separation accessible for individuals discarding solid waste at the property; provided, that the containers shall:

(A)

Be capable of containing reasonably anticipated source-separated waste generated at the location; and

(B)

Bear or be near visible signage indicating the category of source- separated material by visuals or description or shall comply with a color scheme established by the Mayor;

(2)

Annually communicating information to an individual discarding solid waste at the property regarding the types of materials that must be source separated at the property; and

(3)

Ensuring annual training on the property’s source separation requirements of any janitorial staff employed at the property.

(b)

The Mayor may require a private collection property owner to submit a source separation plan outlining the steps the property owner will take to implement the requirements of this chapter.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 104, 61 DCR 9971